Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5072 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall not require, as a


condition of participation in the state Medicaid program, a provider


to submit an attestation or other document disclosing whether the


provider performs, refers for, or is affiliated with any entity that


performs abortions including, but not limited to, by requiring such


attestation or document as a condition of:


1. Contracting with the Authority or any contracted entity for


Medicaid services;


2. Receiving payment for Medicaid services; or

Req. No. 2669 Page 1


3. Receiving any credentialing necessary for Medicaid


providers.


B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board shall promulgate


rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2669 DC 1/13/2026 8:02:58 PM





























Req. No. 2669 Page 2